Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5297.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-56 of the General Laws entitled "Corrections Department" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-56-43. Conjugal visits.
(a) Conditions of conjugal visits.
(1) Conjugal visits for persons incarcerated at state correctional facilities shall not be
recorded or monitored by video surveillance.
(2) The exchange of contraband during conjugal visits is strictly prohibited and shall result
in disciplinary action against both the inmate and the visitor involved.
(3) Conjugal visits shall have a maximum duration of four (4) hours.
(4) An inmate may have up to six (6) conjugal visits per year.
(5) The warden or other building director of the state correctional facility:
(i) Shall have the discretion to suspend conjugal visits; provided that, the inmate is awarded
at least one conjugal visit per calendar year, except as provided otherwise in this section; and
(ii) May deem an inmate a danger to themselves or others, and upon making that
determination, may entirely suspend conjugal visits during a calendar year.
(b) Scheduling of conjugal visits.
(1) To schedule a conjugal visit, a person shall adhere to the visitation rules and procedures
established by the department of corrections. This process shall include, at a minimum:
(i) Registering in the inmate visitation system and including a copy of a marriage certificate

showing the person requesting the visit is married to the incarcerated person for whom the visit is
requested;
(ii) Submitting a visitor registration form;
(iii) Confirming the visit with the specific state correctional facility; and
(iv) Following the rules and procedures for visitation in the specific correctional facility.
(c) Implementation:
(1) The department of corrections shall promulgate and enforce rules and regulations
governing conjugal visits within the state's correctional facilities to administer and implement the
provisions of this section.
(2) The department shall provide guidance and training to correctional facility staff
regarding the implementation of conjugal visitation policies and procedures at state correctional
facilities.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC000649
========
LC000649 - Page 2 of 3